Utah statutes.
31A-2-208.5.   Comparison tables.
(1) (a)  The commissioner shall annually publish a table comparing the rates
charged by insurers for private passenger motor vehicle and homeowners
insurance in this state.
(b)  The comparison shall list the top 20 insurers writing the greatest volume
by premium dollar per calendar year and others requesting inclusion in the
comparison.
(c)  The commissioner shall develop at least four hypothetical examples of
risk in preparing the comparison.
(2)  In conjunction with the rate comparison described in Subsection (1), the
commissioner shall publish:
(a)  a table listing, for each insurer compared, the ratio of justified and
questionable complaints received by the department to the premium dollar
amount written by the insurer; and
(b)  a table listing for each insurer the combined loss and expense ratio for
the most current year available.
(3)  The department shall make copies of the tables available to the public at
minimal or no cost.
